Utah statutes.
41-1a-515.   Delivery of certificate by division.
(1)  The division shall deliver the certificate of title to the owner if no
lien or encumbrance is recorded on it.  The division shall deliver the
certificate to the person holding the first lien or encumbrance as recorded on
the certificate.
(2)  The certificate of title shall be delivered:
(a)  in person;
(b)  through the United States mail; or
(c)  electronically.
(3)  If delivered through the United States mail, receipt of the certificate
of title is presumed four days after the mail has been posted.
